Maine, session 132, LD1048.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §1316, sub-§10, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 405,
Pt. A, §124, is amended to read:
10. Notice of rights required. A public utility and a competitive electricity provider
shall notify the public utility's and the competitive electricity provider's employees,
affiliated interests and utility contractors of their rights under this section. A public utility
and a competitive electricity provider shall send an annual notice of the rights under this
section, which must be written in plain English, be in at least 12-point type and be sent
separately from any other communication, to:
A. Persons at the time of the notice performing a service for wages or other
remuneration under a contract of hire, expressed or implied, for the public utility or
competitive electricity provider; and
B. The public utility's and the competitive electricity provider's affiliated interests and
utility contractors.
Page 1 - 132LR1835(03)